Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 1 General Provisions

21-5-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as and may be cited as the “Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 957, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 3, § 2/SB 120.

The 2022 amendment,

effective March 2, 2022, substituted “Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act” for “Ethics in Government Act”.

21-5-2.
Declaration of policy.

It is declared to be the policy of this state, in furtherance of its responsibility to protect the integrity of the democratic process and to ensure fair elections for constitutional offices; state offices; district attorneys; members of the Georgia House of Representatives and Georgia Senate; all constitutional judicial officers; and all county and municipal elected officials, to institute and establish a requirement of public disclosure of campaign contributions and expenditures relative to the seeking of such offices, to the recall of public officers holding elective office, and to the influencing of voter approval or rejection of a proposed constitutional amendment, a state-wide referendum, or a proposed question which is to appear on the ballot in any county or municipal election. Further, it is the policy of this state that the state’s public affairs will be best served by disclosures of significant private interests of public officers and officials which may influence the discharge of their public duties and responsibilities. The General Assembly further finds that it is for the public to determine whether significant private interests of public officers have influenced the state’s public officers to the detriment of their public duties and responsibilities and, in order to make that determination and hold the public officers accountable, the public must have reasonable access to the disclosure of the significant private interests of the public officers of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 957, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 297, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 1/HB 48.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2005 amendment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).

21-5-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Business entity” means any corporation, sole proprietorship, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, professional corporation, enterprise, franchise, association, trust, joint venture, or other entity, whether for profit or nonprofit.

“Campaign committee” means the candidate, person, or committee which accepts contributions or makes expenditures designed to bring about the nomination or election of an individual to any elected office. The term “campaign committee” also means any person or committee which accepts contributions or makes expenditures designed to bring about the recall of a public officer holding elective office or to oppose the recall of a public officer holding elective office or any person or any committee which accepts contributions or makes expenditures designed to bring about the approval or rejection by the voters of any proposed constitutional amendment, a state-wide referendum, or a proposed question which is to appear on the ballot in this state or in a county or a municipal election in this state.

“Campaign contribution disclosure report” means a report filed with the commission by a candidate or the chairperson or treasurer of a campaign committee setting forth all expenditures of more than $100.00 and all contributions of more than $100.00, including contributions and expenditures of lesser amounts when the aggregate amount thereof by or to a person is more than $100.00 for the calendar year in which the report is filed. Such report shall also include the total amount of all individual contributions received or expenditures made of less than $100.00 each. The first report required in the calendar year of the election shall contain all such expenditures made and all such contributions received by the candidate or the committee in prior years in support of the campaign in question.

“Candidate” means an individual who seeks nomination for election or election to any public office, whether or not such an individual is elected; and a person shall be deemed to seek nomination or election if such person has taken necessary action under the laws of this state to qualify such person for nomination for election or election or has received any contributions or made any expenditures in pursuit of such nomination or election or has given such person’s consent for such person’s campaign committee to receive contributions or make expenditures with a view to bringing about such person’s nomination for election or election to such office.

“Commission” means the Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Commission created under Code Section 21-5-4.

“Connected organization” means any organization, including any business entity, labor organization, membership organization, or cooperative, which is not a political action committee as defined in this Code section, but which, directly or indirectly, establishes or administers a political action committee or which provides more than 40 percent of the funds of the political action committee for a calendar year.

“Contribution” means a gift, subscription, membership, loan, forgiveness of debt, advance or deposit of money or anything of value conveyed or transferred for the purpose of influencing the nomination for election or election of any person for office, bringing about the recall of a public officer holding elective office or opposing the recall of a public officer holding elective office, or the influencing of voter approval or rejection of a proposed constitutional amendment, a state-wide referendum, or a proposed question which is to appear on the ballot in this state or in a county or a municipal election in this state. The term specifically shall not include the value of personal services performed by persons who serve without compensation from any source and on a voluntary basis. The term “contribution” shall include other forms of payment made to candidates for office or who hold office when such fees and compensation made can be reasonably construed as a campaign contribution designed to encourage or influence a candidate or public officer holding elective office. The term “contribution” shall also encompass transactions wherein a qualifying fee required of the candidate is furnished or paid by anyone other than the candidate.

“Direct ownership interest” means the holding or possession of good legal or rightful title of property or the holding or enjoyment of real or beneficial use of the property by any person and includes any interest owned or held by a spouse of such person if such interest is held jointly or as tenants in common between the person and spouse.

“Election” means a primary election; run-off election, either primary or general; special election; or general election. The term “election” also means a recall election.

“Election cycle” means the period from the day following the date of an election or appointment of a person to elective public office through and including the date of the next such election of a person to the same public office and shall be construed and applied separately for each elective office.

“Election year” shall be construed and applied separately for each elective office and means for each elective office the calendar year during which a regular or special election to fill such office is held.

“Expenditure” means a purchase, payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or any transfer of money or anything of value made for the purpose of influencing the nomination for election or election of any person, bringing about the recall of a public officer holding elective office or opposing the recall of a public officer holding elective office, or the influencing of voter approval or rejection of a proposed constitutional amendment, a state-wide referendum, or a proposed question which is to appear on the ballot in this state or in a county or a municipal election in this state. The term specifically shall not include the value of personal services performed by persons who serve without compensation from any source and on a voluntary basis. The term “expenditure” shall also include the payment of a qualifying fee for and on behalf of a candidate.

“Fiduciary position” means any position imposing a duty to act primarily for the benefit of another person as an officer, director, manager, partner, guardian, or other designation of general responsibility of a business entity.

“Gift” means any gratuitous transfer to a public officer or any member of the family of the public officer or a loan of property or services which is not a contribution as defined in paragraph (7) of this Code section and which is more than $100.00.

“Independent committee” means any committee, club, association, partnership, corporation, labor union, or other group of persons, other than a campaign committee, political party, or political action committee, which receives donations during a calendar year from persons who are members or supporters of the committee and which expends such funds either for the purpose of affecting the outcome of an election for any elected office or to advocate the election or defeat of any particular candidate.

“Intangible property” means property which is not real property and which is held for profit and includes stocks, bonds, interest in partnerships, choses in action, and other investments but shall not include any ownership interest in any public or private retirement or pension fund, account, or system and shall not include any ownership interest in any public or private life insurance contract or any benefit, value, or proceeds of such life insurance contract.

(16.1)

“Investment” means the investment of money or capital to gain interest or income.

(16.2)

“Loan” means a thing that is borrowed, especially a sum of money that is expected to be paid back with interest to the lender.

“Member of the family” means a spouse and all dependent children.

(17.1)

“Nonelection year” shall be construed and applied separately for each elective office and means for each elective office any calendar year during which there is no regular or special election to fill such office.

(17.2)

“Nonprofit organization” means a corporation, foundation, or other legal entity, no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual holding an interest in such entity.

“Ordinary and necessary expenses” shall include, but shall not be limited to, expenditures made during the reporting period for qualifying fees, office costs and rent, lodging, equipment, travel, advertising, postage, staff salaries, consultants, files storage, polling, special events, volunteers, reimbursements to volunteers, repayment of any loans received except as restricted under subsection (i) of Code Section 21-5-41, contributions to nonprofit organizations, flowers for special occasions, which shall include, but are not limited to, birthdays and funerals, attorney fees connected to and in the furtherance of the campaign, and all other expenditures contemplated in Code Section 21-5-33.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, committee, association, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, trust, professional corporation, or other business entity recognized in the State of Georgia, labor organization, or any other organization or group of persons.

“Political action committee” means:

Any committee, club, association, partnership, corporation, labor union, or other group of persons which receives donations during a calendar year from persons who are members or supporters of the committee and which contributes funds to one or more candidates for public office or campaign committees of candidates for public office; and

A “separate segregated fund” as defined in Code Section 21-5-40.

Such term does not include a candidate campaign committee.

“Public employee” means every person employed by the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government, or any department, board, bureau, agency, commission, or authority thereof.

“Public officer” means:

The Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Attorney General, Commissioner of Labor, Commissioner of Agriculture, Commissioner of Insurance, and State School Superintendent;

Every other elected state official not listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

The executive head of every state department or agency, whether elected or appointed;

Each member of the General Assembly;

The executive director of each state board, commission, council, or authority and the members thereof;

Every elected county official and every elected member of a local board of education; and

Every elected municipal official.

“Qualifying officer” means a person who qualifies a candidate for an election.

“Reporting period” means the period of time beginning the day after the last report due date, excluding any grace period, through the due date of the next report.

“Staff attorney” means a licensed member of the Georgia Bar Association that is employed by the Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 957, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 297, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 458, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 922, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1279, § 14; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 2/HB 48; Ga. L. 2006, p. 69, § 1/SB 467; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 2/SB 17; Ga. L. 2013, p. 173, § 2/HB 143; Ga. L. 2022, p. 3, § 3/SB 120.

The 2022 amendment,

effective March 2, 2022, added paragraph (16.2); rewrote subparagraph (22)(A), which read: “Every constitutional officer”; rewrote subparagraph (22)(B), which read: “Every elected state official”; and added paragraph (25).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that for purposes of issuing rules and regulations, that Act became effective May 1, 2000.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Disclosure reports, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Ethics Commission, Chapter 189-3.

Law reviews.

For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 247 (1992).

For article on 2005 amendment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).

21-5-4.
Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Commission; membership; officers; quorum; meetings.

The Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Commission shall be a successor to the State Ethics Commission, with such duties and powers as are set forth in this chapter. As the successor commission, it shall have all the powers and duties granted to the State Ethics Commission in all matters pending before the State Ethics Commission and may continue to investigate, prosecute, and act upon all such matters.

The commission shall be governed by five members appointed as follows: three members, not more than two of whom shall be from the same political party, shall be appointed by the Governor, two for terms of three years and one for a term of two years; one member shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Assignments for a term of four years; and one member shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives for a term of four years. Upon the expiration of a member’s term of office, a new member, appointed in the same manner as the member whose term of office expired as provided in this subsection, shall become a member of the commission and shall serve for a term of four years and until such member’s successor is duly appointed and qualified. If a vacancy occurs in the membership of the commission, a new member shall be appointed to the unexpired term of office by the state official or the committee that appointed the vacating member. Members of the commission shall not serve for more than one complete term of office.

All members of the commission shall be residents of this state.

Any person who:

Has qualified to run for any federal, state, or local public office within a period of five years prior to such person’s appointment;

Has held any federal, state, or local public office within a period of five years prior to such person’s appointment; or

Serves as an officer of any political party, whether such office is elective or appointive and whether such office exists on a local, state, or national level

shall be ineligible to serve as a member of the commission.

The commission shall elect a chairperson, a vice chairperson, and other officers as it deems necessary. The members shall not be compensated for their services but they shall be reimbursed in an amount equal to the per diem received by the General Assembly for each day or portion thereof spent in serving as members of the commission. They shall be paid their necessary traveling expenses while engaged in the business of the commission.

A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business. The vote of at least a majority of the members present at any meeting at which a quorum is present is necessary for any action to be taken by the commission. No vacancy in the membership of the commission impairs the right of a quorum to exercise all rights and perform all duties of the commission.

Meetings of the members of the commission shall be held at the call of the chairperson or whenever any two members so request.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 957, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 297, § 3; Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 3/HB 48; Ga. L. 2006, p. 69, § 1/SB 467; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 3/SB 17.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘ Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Organization, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Ethics Commission, Chapter 189-1.

Law reviews.

For article on 2005 amendment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).

21-5-5.
Operating expenses.

The funds necessary to carry out this chapter shall come from the funds appropriated to and available to the commission and from any other available funds. The commission shall be a budget unit as defined in Part 1 of Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 45, the “Budget Act”; provided, however, that the commission shall be assigned for administrative purposes only to the State Accounting Office.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 957, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 4/HB 48; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 4/SB 17; Ga. L. 2022, p. 3, § 4/SB 120.

The 2022 amendment,

effective March 2, 2022, substituted “State Accounting Office” for “Secretary of State” at the end of the second sentence in this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘ Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

21-5-6.
Powers and duties of the commission.

The commission is vested with the following powers:

To meet at such times and places as it may deem necessary;

To contract with other agencies, public or private, or persons as it deems necessary for the rendering and affording of such services, facilities, studies, and reports to the commission as will best assist it to carry out its duties and responsibilities;

To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of every department, agency, or instrumentality in the state government or its political subdivisions in the furtherance of the purposes of this chapter;

To employ an executive secretary and such additional staff as the commission deems necessary to carry out the powers delegated to the commission by this chapter;

To issue subpoenas to compel any person to appear, give sworn testimony, or produce documentary or other evidence;

To institute and prosecute actions in the superior courts, in its own name, seeking to enjoin or restrain any violation or threatened violation of this chapter;

Except as provided for in subsection (c) of Code Section 21-5-33, to adopt in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” any rules and regulations necessary and appropriate for carrying out the purposes of this chapter; provided, however, that the commission shall not require the reporting or disclosure of more information on any campaign contribution disclosure report or personal financial disclosure statement than is expressly required to be reported or disclosed by this chapter; and

To do any and all things necessary or convenient to enable it to perform wholly and adequately its duties and to exercise the powers specifically authorized to it in this chapter.

The commission shall have the following duties:

To prescribe forms to be used in complying with this chapter;

To prepare and publish in print or electronically a manual setting forth recommended uniform methods of accounting and reporting for use by persons required by this chapter to file statements and reports;

To accept and file any information voluntarily supplied that exceeds the requirements of this chapter;

To develop a filing, coding, and cross-indexing system consonant with the purposes of this chapter;

To adopt a retention standard for records of the commission in accordance with Article 5 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, the “Georgia Records Act”;

To prepare and publish in print or electronically such other reports and technical studies as in its judgment will tend to promote the purposes of this chapter;

To provide for public dissemination of such summaries and reports;

To determine whether the required statements and reports have been filed and, if so, whether they conform to the requirements of this chapter;

To make investigations, subject to the limitations contained in Code Section 21-5-7.1, with respect to the statements and reports filed under this chapter and with respect to alleged failure to file any statements or reports required under this chapter and upon receipt of the written complaint of any person, including a staff attorney employed by the commission, verified under oath to the best information, knowledge, and belief by the person or staff attorney making such complaint with respect to an alleged violation of any provision of this chapter, provided that nothing in this Code section shall be construed to limit or encumber the right of the commission to initiate on probable cause an investigation on its own cognizance as it deems necessary to fulfill its obligations under this chapter;

To conduct a preliminary investigation, subject to the limitations contained in Code Section 21-5-7.1, of the merits of a written complaint by any person, including a staff attorney employed by the commission, who believes that a violation of this chapter has occurred, verified under oath to the best information, knowledge, and belief by the person or staff attorney making such complaint. If there are found no reasonable grounds to believe that a violation has occurred, the complaint shall be dismissed, subject to being reopened upon discovery of additional evidence or relevant material. If the commission determines that there are such reasonable grounds to believe that a violation has occurred, it shall give notice by summoning the persons believed to have committed the violation to a hearing. The hearing shall be conducted in all respects in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The commission may file, through a staff attorney employed by the commission, a complaint charging violations of this chapter, and any person aggrieved by the final decision of the commission is entitled to judicial review in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall be construed to limit or encumber the right of the commission to initiate on probable cause an investigation on its own cognizance as it deems necessary to fulfill its obligations under this chapter.

In any such preliminary investigation referenced in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, until such time as the commission determines that there are reasonable grounds to believe that a violation has occurred, it shall not be necessary to give the notice by summons nor to conduct a hearing in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act”;

To report suspected violations of law to the appropriate law enforcement authority;

To investigate upon a written complaint any illegal use of public employees in a political campaign by any candidate;

To issue, upon written request, and publish in print or electronically written advisory opinions on the requirements of this chapter, based on a real or hypothetical set of circumstances; and each such written advisory opinion shall be issued within 60 days of the written request for the advisory opinion. The commission shall make all advisory opinions that were issued after January 9, 2006, publicly available for review and shall post these and all future opinions on the commission’s website, and the commission shall make all advisory opinions that were issued prior to January 9, 2006, publicly available for review and shall post these opinions on the commission’s website. No liability shall be imposed under this chapter for any act or omission made in conformity with a written advisory opinion issued by the commission that is valid at the time of the act or omission;

To issue orders, after the completion of appropriate proceedings, directing compliance with this chapter or prohibiting the actual or threatened commission of any conduct constituting a violation. Such order may include a provision requiring the violator:

To cease and desist from committing further violations;

To make public complete statements, in corrected form, containing the information required by this chapter;

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of Code Section 21-5-7.1, to pay a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000.00 for each violation contained in any report required by this chapter or for each failure to comply with any other provision of this chapter or of any rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter; provided, however, that a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000.00 may be imposed for a second occurrence of a violation of the same provision and a civil penalty not to exceed $25,000.00 may be imposed for each third or subsequent occurrence of a violation of the same provision. In imposing a penalty or late filing fee under this chapter, the commission may waive or suspend such penalty or fee if the imposition of such penalty or fee would impose an undue hardship on the person required to pay such penalty or fee. The commission may also waive or suspend a penalty or fee in the case of failure to file or late filing of a report if there are no items to be included in the report. For the purposes of the penalties imposed by this division, the same error, act, omission, or inaccurate entry shall be considered a single violation if the error, act, omission, or inaccurate entry appears multiple times on the same report or causes further errors, omissions, or inaccurate entries in that report or in any future reports or further violations in that report or in any future reports.

A civil penalty shall not be assessed except after notice and hearing as provided by Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The amount of any civil penalty finally assessed shall be recoverable by a civil action brought in the name of the commission. All moneys recovered pursuant to this Code section shall be deposited in the state treasury.

The Attorney General of this state shall, upon complaint by the commission, or may, upon the Attorney General’s own initiative if after examination of the complaint and evidence the Attorney General believes a violation has occurred, bring an action in the superior court in the name of the commission for a temporary restraining order or other injunctive relief or for civil penalties for a violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation duly issued by the commission.

Any action brought by the Attorney General to enforce civil penalties for a violation of the provisions of this chapter or of any rule or regulation duly issued by the commission or any order issued by the commission ordering compliance or to cease and desist from further violations shall be brought in the superior court of the county of the residence of the party against whom relief is sought. Service of process shall lie in any jurisdiction within the state. In such actions, the superior court inquiry shall be limited to whether notice was given by the commission to the violator in compliance with the Constitution and the rules of procedure of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” Upon satisfaction that notice was given and a hearing was held pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” the superior court shall enforce the orders of the commission and the civil penalties assessed under this chapter and the superior court shall not make independent inquiry as to whether the violations have occurred.

In any action brought by the Attorney General to enforce any of the provisions of this chapter or of any rule or regulation issued by the commission, the judgment, if in favor of the commission, shall provide that the defendant pay to the commission the costs, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, incurred by the commission in the prosecution of such action.

The commission shall make all such orders that were issued after January 9, 2006, publicly available for review and shall post these and all future orders on the commission’s website, and the commission shall make all advisory orders that were issued prior to January 9, 2006, publicly available for review and shall post these orders on the commission’s website. Such orders shall serve as precedent for all future orders and opinions of the commission;

To make public its conclusion that a violation has occurred and the nature of such violation;

To petition the superior court within the county where the hearing was or is being conducted for the enforcement of any order issued in connection with such hearing;

To report to the General Assembly and the Governor at the close of each fiscal year concerning the action taken during that time, the names, salaries, and duties of all individuals employed, and the funds disbursed and to make such further report on the matters within its jurisdiction as may appear desirable;

To carry out the procedures, duties, and obligations relative to the commission set forth in this chapter;

On a quarterly basis, to prepare, update, and publish in print or electronically a report and post such report on its website, listing the name of each filer required to file with the commission who has not filed the most recent campaign contribution disclosure report required by Code Sections 21-5-34 and 21-5-34.1, the financial disclosure statement required by Code Section 21-5-50, or the disclosure report required by Code Section 21-5-73 within 30 days of the date such report was due to be filed;

To publish in print or electronically overall lobbyist spending by category. Such categories shall include gifts, meals, entertainment, office supplies, lodging, equipment, advertising, travel, and postage;

To promulgate rules and regulations with respect to electronic filings;

To provide and conduct semiannual training on the mechanics of electronic filing and registration;

To award attorneys’ fees to the party complained against if the commission deems the complaint to be frivolous, legally or factually; and

To issue a warning letter to persons who have not filed any statement or report required by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 957, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 297, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1992, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 5/HB 48; Ga. L. 2006, p. 69, § 1/SB 467; Ga. L. 2009, p. 620, § 1/SB 168; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 5/SB 17; Ga. L. 2011, p. 19, § 1/HB 232; Ga. L. 2011, p. 590, § 1/HB 143; Ga. L. 2013, p. 173, § 1/HB 143; Ga. L. 2013, p. 540, § 1/HB 142; Ga. L. 2022, p. 3, § 5/SB 120.

The 2022 amendment,

effective March 2, 2022,
in paragraph (a)(7), substituted “Except as provided for in subsection (c) of Code Section 21-5-33, to adopt” for “To adopt”, substituted “campaign contribution disclosure report or personal financial disclosure statement” for “report”, and deleted “, unless such information was required to be reported or disclosed by rules and regulations of the commission which were in effect as of January 1, 2013, so long as such rules and regulations do not conflict with this chapter” following “by this chapter”; in paragraph (b)(9), inserted “including a staff attorney employed by the commission,” and “or staff attorney”; in subparagraph (b)(10)(A), in the first sentence, inserted “, including a staff attorney employed by the commission,” and “or staff attorney”, and inserted “, through a staff attorney employed by the commission,” in the last sentence; and deleted “, or if the complaining party fails, without good cause, to appear at the preliminary hearing on the complaint” following “factually” in paragraph (23).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 19, § 10/HB 232, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval. It is the express intention of the General Assembly that this Act be applied retroactively to January 10, 2011, as well as prospectively.” This Act became effective March 15, 2011.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Organization, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Ethics Commission, Chapter 189-1.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2013 amendment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 129 (2013).

21-5-7.
Initiation of complaints.

The commission shall not initiate any investigation or inquiry into any matter under its jurisdiction based upon the complaint of any person, including a staff attorney employed by the commission, unless that person or staff attorney shall produce the same in writing and verify the same under oath to the best information, knowledge, and belief of such person, the falsification of which shall be punishable as false swearing under Code Section 16-10-71. The person against whom any complaint is made shall be furnished by hand delivery or statutory overnight delivery or mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, a copy of the complaint by the commission within two business days of the commission’s receipt of such complaint and prior to any other public dissemination of such complaint.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 957, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 297, § 6; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1619, § 6; Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 6/HB 48; Ga. L. 2022, p. 3, § 6/SB 120.

The 2022 amendment,

effective March 2, 2022, in the first sentence, inserted “, including a staff attorney employed by the commission,” and “or staff attorney” and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Nothing in this Code section, however, shall be construed to limit or encumber the right of the commission to initiate on probable cause an investigation on its own cognizance as it deems necessary to fulfill its obligations under this chapter.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on 2005 amendment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).